Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201947-1003
Terms, defined.

For the purposes of the Healthy Pregnancies for Incarcerated Women Act:

(1) Administrator means the Director of Correctional Services, the sheriff or other person charged with administration of a jail, or any other official responsible for the administration of a detention facility;

(2) Detainee includes any adult or juvenile female detained under the immigration laws of the United States at any detention facility;

(3) Detention facility means any:

(a) Facility operated by the Department of Correctional Services;

(b) City or county jail;

(c) Juvenile detention facility or staff secure juvenile facility as such terms are defined in section 83-4,125; or

(d) Any other entity or institution operated by the state, a political subdivision, or a combination of political subdivisions for the careful keeping or rehabilitative needs of prisoners or detainees;

(4) Labor means the period of time before a birth during which contractions are of sufficient frequency, intensity, and duration to bring about effacement and progressive dilation of the cervix;

(5) Postpartum recovery means, as determined by her physician, the period immediately following delivery, including the entire period a woman is in the hospital or infirmary after birth;

(6) Prisoner means any adult or juvenile incarcerated or detained in any detention facility and includes, but is not limited to, any adult or juvenile who is accused of, convicted of, sentenced for, or adjudicated for violations of criminal law or the terms and conditions of parole, probation, pretrial release, post-release supervision, or a diversionary program; and

(7) Restraints means any physical restraint or mechanical device used to control the movement of a prisoner or detainee's body or limbs, including, but not limited to, flex cuffs, soft restraints, hard metal handcuffs, a black box, Chubb cuffs, leg irons, belly chains, a security or tether chain, or a convex shield.

Laws 2019, LB690, § 3.